Nebraska statutes.
Section 1.Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201072-270
Production of wind or solar energy;
leases; sections applicable.

Leases involving the production of wind or solar energy
on lands under the control of the Board of Educational Lands and Funds shall
be regulated by sections 72-270 to 72-274.

Laws 2010, LB235, § 1.
February 12, 2010